Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2853SV (3) 91 ss/ns S.F. 544 DIVISION I 1 LEGISLATIVE SALARIES 2 Section 1. Section 2.10, subsections 1, 2, and 8, Code 2025, 3 are amended to read as follows: 4 1. Every Subject to the annual adjustments provided in 5 subsection 8, every member of the general assembly except the 6 presiding officer of the senate, the speaker of the house, 7 the majority and minority floor leader of each house, and the 8 president pro tempore of the senate and speaker pro tempore 9 of the house shall receive an annual salary of twenty-five 10 forty-five thousand dollars for the year 2007 2027 and 11 subsequent years while serving as a member of the general 12 assembly. In addition, each such member shall receive a per 13 diem, as defined in subsection 5 , for expenses of office, 14 except travel, for each day the general assembly is in session 15 commencing with the first day of a legislative session and 16 ending with the day of final adjournment of each legislative 17 session as indicated by the journals of the house and senate, 18 except that if the length of the first regular session of the 19 general assembly exceeds one hundred ten calendar days and 20 the second regular session exceeds one hundred calendar days, 21 the payments shall be made only for one hundred ten calendar 22 days for the first session and one hundred calendar days for 23 the second session. Members from Polk county shall receive an 24 amount per day equal to three-fourths of the per diem of the 25 non-Polk county members. Each member shall receive a three 26 four hundred fifty dollar per month allowance for legislative 27 district constituency postage, travel, telephone costs, and 28 other expenses. Travel expenses shall be paid at the rate 29 established by section 8A.363 for actual travel in going to and 30 returning from the seat of government by the nearest traveled 31 route for not more than one time per week during a legislative 32 session unless the general assembly otherwise provides. 33 2. The Subject to the annual adjustments provided in 34 subsection 8, the speaker of the house, presiding officer of 35 -1- LSB 2853SV (3) 91 ss/ns 1/ 7 S.F. 544 the senate, and the majority and minority floor leader of each 1 house shall each receive an annual salary of thirty-seven 2 sixty-seven thousand five hundred dollars for the year 2007 3 2027 and subsequent years while serving in that capacity. 4 The Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 5 8, the president pro tempore of the senate and the speaker 6 pro tempore of the house shall receive an annual salary of 7 twenty-seven forty-nine thousand dollars for the year 2007 2027 8 and subsequent years while serving in that capacity. Expense 9 and travel allowances shall be the same for the speaker of the 10 house and the presiding officer of the senate, the president 11 pro tempore of the senate and the speaker pro tempore of the 12 house, and the majority and minority leader of each house as 13 provided for other members of the general assembly. 14 8. Commencing upon the convening of the Seventy-eighth 15 Ninety-second General Assembly in January 1999 2028 , and 16 for each calendar year thereafter until calendar year 2043, 17 the annual salaries of members and officers of the general 18 assembly, as the annual salaries existed during the preceding 19 calendar year, shall be adjusted by an amount equal to the 20 average of the annual cost-of-living pay adjustments negotiated 21 for the members of the collective bargaining units represented 22 by the state police officers council labor union, the American 23 federation of state, county, and municipal employees, and the 24 Iowa united professionals for the annual cost-of-living pay 25 adjustment received by executive branch noncontract state 26 employees during the preceding fiscal year beginning July 1, 27 1997 or three percent, whichever is less . For the calendar 28 year 2000, during the month of January, the annual salaries of 29 members and officers of the general assembly shall be adjusted 30 by an amount equal to the average of the annual cost-of-living 31 pay adjustments received by the members of those collective 32 bargaining units for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1998. 33 The annual salaries determined for the members and officers 34 as provided in this section for the calendar year 2000 shall 35 -2- LSB 2853SV (3) 91 ss/ns 2/ 7 S.F. 544 remain in effect for subsequent calendar years until otherwise 1 provided by the general assembly. For purposes of this 2 subsection, ânoncontract state employeesâ means state employees 3 not covered by a collective bargaining agreement under chapter 4 20 and who are not appointed officials. 5 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. The following applies upon the 6 convening of the Ninety-second General Assembly in January 7 2027: 8 The portion of the section of this division of this Act 9 amending section 2.10, subsections 1 and 2. 10 DIVISION II 11 SALARIES OF STATEWIDE ELECTED EXECUTIVE OFFICIALS 12 Sec. 3. Section 7.8, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 13 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 14 7.8 Salary ââ governor and lieutenant governor. 15 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 16 3, the governor shall receive an annual salary of two hundred 17 thirty thousand dollars, and the lieutenant governor shall 18 receive an annual salary of one hundred forty thousand dollars. 19 Payment of expenses and any per diem of the lieutenant governor 20 shall be as fixed by the general assembly. 21 2. The salaries of the governor and lieutenant governor 22 shall be paid from moneys appropriated to the office of the 23 governor and lieutenant governor pursuant to any Act of the 24 general assembly. 25 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and for each 26 fiscal year thereafter until the fiscal year beginning July 27 1, 2042, the annual salaries of the governor and lieutenant 28 governor, as the annual salaries existed during the preceding 29 fiscal year, shall be adjusted by an amount equal to the annual 30 cost-of-living pay adjustment received by executive branch 31 noncontract state employees during the preceding fiscal year, 32 or three percent, whichever is less. For purposes of this 33 subsection, ânoncontract state employeesâ means state employees 34 not covered by a collective bargaining agreement under chapter 35 -3- LSB 2853SV (3) 91 ss/ns 3/ 7 S.F. 544 20 and who are not appointed officials. 1 Sec. 4. Section 9.5, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 2 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 3 9.5 Salary. 4 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 5 3, the secretary of state shall receive an annual salary of one 6 hundred eighty thousand dollars. 7 2. The salary of the secretary of state shall be paid from 8 moneys appropriated to the office of the secretary of state 9 pursuant to any Act of the general assembly. 10 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and for each 11 fiscal year thereafter until the fiscal year beginning July 12 1, 2042, the annual adjusted salary of the secretary of state 13 shall be adjusted as described in section 7.8, subsection 3. 14 Sec. 5. Section 11.30, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 15 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 16 11.30 Salary. 17 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 18 3, the auditor of state shall receive an annual salary of one 19 hundred eighty thousand dollars. 20 2. The salary of the auditor of state shall be paid from 21 moneys appropriated to the office of the auditor of state 22 pursuant to any Act of the general assembly. 23 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and for each 24 fiscal year thereafter until the fiscal year beginning July 1, 25 2042, the annual adjusted salary of the auditor of state shall 26 be adjusted as described in section 7.8, subsection 3. 27 Sec. 6. Section 12.18, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 28 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 29 12.18 Salary. 30 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 31 3, the treasurer of state shall receive an annual salary of one 32 hundred eighty thousand dollars. 33 2. The salary of the treasurer of state shall be paid from 34 moneys appropriated to the office of the treasurer of state 35 -4- LSB 2853SV (3) 91 ss/ns 4/ 7 S.F. 544 pursuant to any Act of the general assembly. 1 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and for each 2 fiscal year thereafter until the fiscal year beginning July 3 1, 2042, the annual adjusted salary of the treasurer of state 4 shall be adjusted as described in section 7.8, subsection 3. 5 Sec. 7. Section 13.9, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 6 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 7 13.9 Salary. 8 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 9 3, the attorney general shall receive an annual salary of two 10 hundred ten thousand dollars. 11 2. The salary of the attorney general shall be paid from 12 moneys appropriated to the department of justice pursuant to 13 any Act of the general assembly. 14 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and for each 15 fiscal year thereafter until the fiscal year beginning July 1, 16 2042, the annual adjusted salary of the attorney general shall 17 be adjusted as described in section 7.8, subsection 3. 18 4. The salaries of the chief deputy attorney general and 19 other deputy and assistant attorneys general shall be such as 20 may be fixed by law. 21 Sec. 8. Section 159.19, Code 2025, is amended by striking 22 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 23 159.19 Salary. 24 1. Subject to the annual adjustments provided in subsection 25 3, the secretary of agriculture shall receive an annual salary 26 of one hundred eighty thousand dollars. 27 2. The salary of the secretary of agriculture shall be paid 28 from moneys appropriated to the department pursuant to any Act 29 of the general assembly. 30 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and for 31 each fiscal year thereafter until the fiscal year beginning 32 July 1, 2042, the annual adjusted salary for the secretary of 33 agriculture shall be adjusted as described in section 7.8, 34 subsection 3. 35 -5- LSB 2853SV (3) 91 ss/ns 5/ 7 S.F. 544 Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 1 effect January 1, 2027. 2